North Carolina, session 2025, HB611.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) To Provide for Assistant Principals. – Local boards of education shall increase
full-time, permanent assistant principal positions employed in local school
administrative units based on average daily membership for each fiscal year
until the 2026-2027 fiscal year. Beginning in the 2025-2026 fiscal year, in
order to increase assistant principal positions under this subdivision, there is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Public Instruction
for the following fiscal years the following amounts to the school building
administration allotment to increase the ratios of funds allotted for months of
employment for assistant principals to students, as follows:
Fiscal Year Assistant Principals Appropriation
2025-2026 1 month:90 students $23,560,043
2026-2027
and each subsequent
fiscal year thereafter 1 month:80 students $57,568,035."
SECTION 2. Funds provided pursuant to this act shall supplement and not supplant
any funds from any source already provided for assistant principals.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025. Section 1 of this act applies
beginning with the 2025-2026 school year.
*H611-v-1*